Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.330

Investments—Loans, preferred stock, or interest-bearing obligations—Restrictions.

A mutual savings bank may invest in loans to sole proprietorships, partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, or other entities, or in preferred stock or discounted or other interest bearing obligations issued, guaranteed, or assumed by limited liability companies or corporations commonly accepted as industrial corporations or engaged in communications, transportation, agriculture, furnishing utility professional services, manufacturing, construction, mining, fishing, processing or merchandising of goods, food, or information, banking, or commercial or consumer financing, doing business or incorporated under the laws of the United States, or any state thereof, or the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, or any province thereof, subject to the following conditions:

(1) Not more than two percent of the bank's funds shall be invested, pursuant to this section, in the aggregate of loans to and preferred stock and obligations of any person, as defined in *RCW 32.32.228(1)(c), and such person's affiliates, as defined in RCW 32.32.025(1), incorporating the definition of control in RCW 32.32.025(8).

(2) Such loans or securities shall be prudent investments.

(3) Pursuant to this section, the total amount a savings bank may invest shall not exceed fifty percent of its funds, and not more than fifteen percent of the bank's funds may be invested in such loans to or securities of any industry.

[ 1999 c 14 s 26; 1985 c 56 s 13; 1973 1st ex.s. c 31 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 222 s 6; 1955 c 80 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 32.32.228 was amended by 2005 c 348 s 5, changing subsection (1)(c) to subsection (1)(d).

Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 31: See RCW 32.20.500.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 222: See note following RCW 32.04.085.